Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF92.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1120XS (3) 91 sc/js S.F. 92 Section 1. Section 6A.21, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The limitation on the definition of public use, 3 public purpose, or public improvement does not apply to the 4 establishment, relocation, or improvement of a road pursuant 5 to chapter 306 , or to the establishment of a railway under the 6 supervision of the department of transportation as provided in 7 section 327C.2 , or to an airport as defined in section 328.1 , 8 or to land acquired in order to replace or mitigate land used 9 in a road project when federal law requires replacement or 10 mitigation. This limitation also does not apply to utilities, 11 persons, companies, or corporations under the jurisdiction 12 of the Iowa utilities commission or to any other utility 13 conferred the right by statute to condemn private property or 14 to otherwise exercise the power of eminent domain, except to 15 the extent such purpose includes construction of hazardous 16 liquid pipelines for the transportation or transmission of 17 liquefied carbon dioxide or aboveground merchant lines. For 18 purposes of this subsection, âutilityâ means a public utility as 19 defined in section 306.46, subsection 2. 20 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 21 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 22 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to condemnation 23 proceedings for which the application filed under section 6B.3 24 is filed on or after the effective date of the Act. 25